Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.200

Local improvement districts—Content of notice.

Any notice given to the public or to the owners of specific lots, tracts, or parcels of land relating to the formation of a local improvement district created under RCW 35.81.190 shall contain a statement that actual assessments may vary from assessment estimates so long as they do not exceed a figure equal to the increased benefit the improvement adds to the property.

[ 2002 c 218 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.